Wisconsin, session 2025, AB842.
do enact as follows:AB842,11Section 1. 450.01 (21c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB842,2,32450.01 (21c) “Remote dispensing site” “Remotely supervised pharmacy” 3means a pharmacy governed by s. 450.09 (2) (b) 2.AB842,24Section 2. 450.02 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB842,2,105450.02 (5) The board may promulgate rules governing pharmacies that are 6operated as remote dispensing sites remotely supervised pharmacies. Rules 7promulgated under this subsection may exempt pharmacies operated as remote 8dispensing sites remotely supervised pharmacies from requirements governing 9pharmacies that are not operated as remote dispensing sites remotely supervised 10pharmacies.AB842,311Section 3. 450.09 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB842,2,2212450.09 (1) (a) Every pharmacy shall be under the control of the managing 13pharmacist who signed the pharmacy license application, the most recent license 14renewal application or the most recent amended schedule of operations. The 15managing pharmacist shall be responsible for the professional operations of the 16pharmacy. A pharmacist may be the managing pharmacist of not more than one 17community and one institutional pharmacy at any time and shall be engaged in the 18practice of pharmacy at each location he or she supervises. The board shall by rule 19define community pharmacy and institutional pharmacy for the purposes of this 20section, but a pharmacy that is operated exclusively as a remote dispensing site 21remotely supervised pharmacy shall not be considered a community pharmacy or 22institutional pharmacy for the purposes of this paragraph.AB842,41Section 4. 450.09 (2) (b) 1. (intro.) and 2. (intro.) of the statutes are 2consolidated, renumbered 450.09 (2) (b) (intro.) and amended to read:AB842,3,73450.09 (2) (b) (intro.) A If pharmaceutical services are to be provided 4without a pharmacist is not required to be being present in a the pharmacy if the 5pharmacy is any of the following locations: 2. Whenever a pharmacist is not 6present at the pharmacy when allowed under subd. 1., all of the following shall 7apply:AB842,58Section 5. 450.09 (2) (b) 1. a. to d. of the statutes are repealed.AB842,69Section 6. 450.09 (2) (b) 2. a. of the statutes is renumbered 450.09 (2) (b) 1m. 10and amended to read:AB842,3,1311450.09 (2) (b) 1m. The pharmacy shall be considered a remote dispensing site 12remotely supervised pharmacy and shall be subject to and governed by any rules 13promulgated under s. 450.02 (5).AB842,714Section 7. 450.09 (2) (b) 2. b. of the statutes are renumbered 450.09 (2) (b) 152m.AB842,3,1616